North Carolina, session 2025, HB456.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 58-3-190 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-3-190. Coverage required for emergency care.
(a) Every insurer shall provide coverage for emergency services to the extent necessary
to screen and to stabilize the person covered under the plan or to transport the covered person to
a medically appropriate location for screening and stabilization and shall not require prior
authorization of the services if a prudent layperson acting reasonably would have believed that
an emergency medical condition existed. Payment of claims for emergency services shall be
based on the retrospective review of the presenting history and symptoms of the covered person.
(b) With respect to emergency services provided by a health care provider who is not
under contract with the insurer, the services shall be covered if:if any of the following criteria are
met:
(1) A prudent layperson acting reasonably would have believed that a delay would
worsen the emergency, oremergency.
(2) The covered person did not seek services from a provider under contract with
the insurer because of circumstances beyond the control of the covered person.
(3) The covered person did not have a choice in the ground ambulance
transportation service provider due to the emergency.
…
(d) Coverage of emergency services shall may be subject to coinsurance, co-payments,
and deductibles applicable under the health benefit plan. An insurer shall not impose cost-sharing
for emergency services provided under this section section, including emergency ambulance
transportation services, that differs from the cost-sharing that would have been imposed if the
physician or provider furnishing the services were a provider contracting with the insurer.
…
(f) Insurers shall provide information to their covered persons on all of the following:
(1) Coverage of emergency medical services.
(2) The appropriate use of emergency services, including the use of the "911"
system and other telephone access systems utilized to access prehospital
emergency services.
(3) Any cost-sharing provisions for emergency medical services.
*H456-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) The process and procedures for obtaining emergency services, so that covered
persons are familiar with the location of in-plan emergency departments and
with the location and availability of other in-plan settings at which covered
persons may receive medical care.
(g) As used in this section, the term:The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) "Emergency Emergency medical condition" means a condition. – A medical
condition manifesting itself by acute symptoms of sufficient severity,
including, but not limited to, severe pain, or by acute symptoms developing
from a chronic medical condition that would lead a prudent layperson,
possessing an average knowledge of health and medicine, to reasonably
expect the absence of immediate medical attention to result in any of the
following:
a. Placing the health of an individual, or with respect to a pregnant
woman, the health of the woman or her unborn child, in serious
jeopardy.
b. Serious impairment to bodily functions.
c. Serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part.
(2) "Emergency services" means health care Emergency services. – Healthcare
items and services furnished or required to screen for or treat an emergency
medical condition until the condition is stabilized, including prehospital care
care, ambulance transportation services, and ancillary services routinely
available to the emergency department.
(3) "Health benefit plan" means any of the following if written by an insurer: an
accident and health insurance policy or certificate; a nonprofit hospital or
medical service corporation contract; a health maintenance organization
subscriber contract; or a plan provided by a multiple employer welfare
arrangement. "Health benefit plan" does not mean any plan implemented or
administered through the Department of Health and Human Services or its
representatives. "Health benefit plan" also does not mean any of the following
kinds of insurance:
a. Accident.
b. Credit.
c. Disability income.
d. Long-term or nursing home care.
e. Medicare supplement.
f. Specified disease.
g. Dental or vision.
h. Coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance.
i. Workers' compensation.
j. Medical payments under automobile or homeowners insurance.
k. Hospital income or indemnity.
l. Insurance under which benefits are payable with or without regard to
fault and that is statutorily required to be contained in any liability
policy or equivalent self-insurance.
(4) "Insurer" means an entity that writes a health benefit plan and that is an
insurance company subject to this Chapter, a service corporation under Article
65 of this Chapter, a health maintenance organization under Article 67 of this
Chapter, or a multiple employer welfare arrangement under Article 50A of
this Chapter.
(5) "To stabilize" means to Stabilize. – To provide medical care that is appropriate
to prevent a material deterioration of the person's condition, within reasonable
Page 2 House Bill 456-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
medical probability, in accordance with the HCFA (Health Care Financing
Administration) Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services interpretative
guidelines, policies and regulations pertaining to responsibilities of hospitals
in emergency cases (as cases, as provided under the Emergency Medical
Treatment and Labor Act, section 1867 of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C.S.
1395dd), including medically necessary services and supplies to maintain
stabilization until the person is transferred.42 U.S.C.S. 1395dd."
SECTION 1.(b) Article 3 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 58-3-193. Coverage for nonemergency ground ambulance transportation.
(a) This section applies to nonemergency ground ambulance transportation service.
Ground ambulance transportation services provided in an emergency situation are defined and
regulated under G.S. 58-3-190.
(b) Nonemergency ground ambulance transportation services may be subject to
cost-sharing, including deductibles, coinsurance, and copayments. When nonemergency ground
ambulance transportation services are provided to an insured by an entity that is not a
participating provider in the insured's health benefit plan, an insurer shall not impose cost-sharing
for those services in an amount greater than one hundred ten percent (110%) of the cost-sharing
amount for nonemergency ground ambulance transportation services provided by a participating
network provider."
SECTION 1.(c) This section becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to
insurance contracts issued, renewed, or amended on or after that date.
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 135-48.51 reads as rewritten:
"§ 135-48.51. Coverage and operational mandates related to Chapter 58 of the General
Statutes.
The following provisions of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes apply to the State Health Plan:
(1) G.S. 58-3-191, Managed care reporting and disclosure requirements.
(1a) G.S. 58-3-193, Coverage for nonemergency ground ambulance
transportation.
…."
SECTION 2.(b) Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Department of State Treasurer the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in recurring
funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to be used to provide the additional
coverage required under this act.
SECTION 2.(c) Subsection (a) of this section applies as of the start of the next plan
year following that date.
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
House Bill 456-First Edition Page 3